Washington statutes.
RCW 39.86.155

State bond ceiling allocation formula.

Original allocations or any reallocations of state bond ceilings other than the tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling must be determined by formula as provided in the code, or by department rule if no formula is provided in the code.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 6 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—2010 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 43.180.160.